Utah statutes.
62A-15-627.   Release of voluntary patient -- Exceptions.

A voluntary patient who requests release, or whose release is requested in writing by his legal guardian, parent, spouse, or adult next of kin, shall be immediately released except that:

(1)  if the patient was voluntarily admitted on his own application, and the request for release is made by a person other than the patient, release may be conditioned upon the agreement of the patient; and

(2)  if a local mental health authority, or  its designee is of the opinion that release of a patient would be unsafe for that patient or others, release of that patient may be postponed for up to 48 hours, excluding weekends and holidays, provided that the  local mental health authority, or its designee, shall cause to be instituted involuntary commitment proceedings with the district court within the specified time period, unless cause no longer exists for instituting those proceedings. Written notice of that postponement with the reasons, shall be given to the patient without undue delay.  No judicial proceedings may be commenced with respect to a voluntary patient unless he has requested release.

